Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1524
Content and substance of forms; general principles.

The following general principles shall in part govern the content and substance of a statutory short form or other version of a power of attorney:

(1) Reference to or other use in a statutory short form or other version of a power of attorney, in the identical indicated words and not in any other formulation of words, of the exact short form expression, durable power of attorney, shall be equivalent to the use of, shall be construed and interpreted with the force and effect of, and shall be deemed to incorporate at length and in full the provisions of the full expression and shall mean that the principal, as permitted and prescribed by the Uniform Durable Power of Attorney Act intends the authority conferred upon the agent to be or to become exercisable without regard to subsequent disability or incapacity of the principal and that the power of attorney either shall not be affected by subsequent disability or incapacity of the principal or shall become effective upon the disability or incapacity of the principal;

(2) Incorporation into or any other use as part of any other short form expression or reference to or other use in a statutory short form or other version of a power of attorney, in the identical indicated words or in substantially the same or more similar than dissimilar formulation of words, of any one or more of each of the respectively indicated short form expressions set out in sections 49-1525 to 49-1544 shall be equivalent to the use of, shall be construed and interpreted with the force and to the effect of, and shall be deemed to incorporate at length and in full the respective provisions of each of the respectively indicated full expressions; and

(3) Incorporation into or any other use as part of any other short form expression or reference to or other use in a statutory short form or other version of a power of attorney, in the identical indicated words or in substantially the same or more similar than dissimilar formulation of words, of any one or more of each of the respectively indicated short form expressions set out in sections 49-1545 to 49-1556 shall be equivalent to the use of, shall be construed and interpreted with the force and to the effect of, and shall be deemed to incorporate at length and in full the respective provisions of each of the respectively indicated full expressions, as further expanded by any additional incorporation required by reference to or use of other provisions of the Nebraska Short Form Act to be effected.

Laws 1988, LB 475, § 24.

Uniform Durable Power of Attorney Act, see section 30-2664.